Utah statutes.
64-13-10.   Department duties -- Rulemaking authority.

(1)  The department shall provide probation supervision programs, parole supervision programs, correctional facilities, community correctional centers, and other programs or facilities as necessary and as required to accomplish its purposes.

(2)  The department may make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, to carry out the provisions of this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

